Hawaii statutes.
[§23-78] Review for 2024 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions or exclusions under the general
excise tax listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2024 and every tenth
year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and recommendations
of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-24.7(1)--Amounts received by hotel
operators and hotel suboperators for employee wages and fringe benefits;

(2) Section 237-24.7(2)--Amounts received by a county
transportation system operator under a contract with the county;

(3) Section 237-24.7(4)--Amounts received by orchard
property operators for employee wages and fringe benefits;

(4) Section 237-24.7(6)--Amounts received from
insurers for damage or loss of inventory of businesses located in a natural
disaster area;

(5) Section 237-24.7(7)--Amounts received by
community organizations, school booster clubs, and nonprofit organizations for
precinct and other election-related activities;

(6) Section 237-24.7(8)--Interest received by persons
domiciled outside the State from trust companies acting as payment agents or
trustees on behalf of issuers or payees of interest-bearing instruments or
obligations;

(7) Section 237-24.7(9)--Amounts received by
management companies from related entities engaged in interstate or foreign
common carrier telecommunications services for employee wages and fringe
benefits; and

(8) Section 237-24.7(10)--Amounts received from high
technology research and development grants. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next